src/dictionaries/pt_PT.aff
SFX h Y 44
SFX h   o              inho           [^cgçãi]o
SFX h   co             quinho         co
SFX h   ço             cinho          ço
SFX h   o              uinho          go
SFX h   0              zinho          ão
SFX h   e              inho           e
SFX h   0              inho           [^ê][sz]
SFX h   ês             esinho         ês
SFX h   0              zinho          [irun]
SFX h   ó              ozinho         ó
SFX h   ô              ozinho         ô
SFX h   é              ezinho         é
SFX h   ú              uzinho         ú
SFX h   m              nzinho         m
SFX h   0              zinho          l
SFX h   o              inhos          [^cgçãi]o
SFX h   co             quinhos        co
SFX h   ço             cinhos         ço
SFX h   o              uinhos         go
SFX h   0              zinhos         ão
SFX h   e              inhos          e
SFX h   0              inhos          [^ê][sz]
SFX h   ês             esinhos        ês
SFX h   0              zinhos         [irun]
SFX h   ó              ozinhos        ó
SFX h   ô              ozinhos        ô
SFX h   é              ezinhos        é
SFX h   ú              uzinhos        ú
SFX h   m              nzinhos        m
SFX h   0              zinhos         l
SFX h   o              inha           [^cgçãi]o
SFX h   a              inha           [^çg]a
SFX h   ca             quinha         ca
SFX h   ça             cinha          ça
SFX h   a              uinha          ga
SFX h   á              azinha         á
SFX h   ã              azinha         ã
SFX h   o              inhas          [^cgçãi]o
SFX h   a              inhas          [^çg]a
SFX h   ca             quinhas        ca
SFX h   ça             cinhas         ça
SFX h   a              uinhas         ga
SFX h   á              azinhas        á
SFX h   ã              azinhas        ã

SFX z Y 4
SFX z   0              zinho          [^ã][eo]
SFX z   0              inho           l
SFX z   0              zinhos         [^ã][eo]
SFX z   0              inhos          l

SFX c Y 8
SFX c   r              ção            [ae]r
SFX c   r              ção            [^zg]ir
SFX c   zir            ção            zir
SFX c   r              sição          por
SFX c   r              ções           [ae]r
SFX c   r              ções           [^zg]ir
SFX c   zir            ções           zir
SFX c   r              sições         por

SFX C Y 6
SFX C   ionar          ção            cionar
SFX C   ir             cção           air
SFX C   ir             ção            uir
SFX C   ionar          ções           cionar
SFX C   ir             cções          air
SFX C   ir             ções           uir

SFX M Y 4
SFX M   r              mento          [ai]r
SFX M   er             imento         er
SFX M   r              mentos         [ai]r
SFX M   er             imentos        er

SFX n Y 6
SFX n   r              nte            [ae]r
SFX n   ir             ente           ir
SFX n   r              nente          or
SFX n   r              ntes           [ae]r
SFX n   ir             entes          ir
SFX n   r              nentes         or

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   r              dor            [aei]r
SFX D   r              dora           [aei]r
SFX D   r              dores          [aei]r
SFX D   r              doras          [aei]r

SFX v Y 6
SFX v   ar             ável           ar
SFX v   er             ível           er
SFX v   ir             ível           ir
SFX v   ar             áveis          ar
SFX v   er             íveis          er
SFX v   ir             íveis          ir

SFX X Y 94
SFX X   ar             o              [^\-]ar
SFX X   r              s              ar
SFX X   ar             a              [^\-]ar
SFX X   r              mos            ar
SFX X   r              is             ar
SFX X   r              m              ar
SFX X   ar             e              [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car            que            car
SFX X   gar            gue            gar
SFX X   çar            ce             çar
SFX X   ar             es             [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car            ques           car
SFX X   gar            gues           gar
SFX X   çar            ces            çar
SFX X   ar             emos           [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car            quemos         car
SFX X   gar            guemos         gar
SFX X   çar            cemos          çar
SFX X   ar             eis            [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car            queis          car
SFX X   gar            gueis          gar
SFX X   çar            ceis           çar
SFX X   ar             em             [^cgç]ar
SFX X   car            quem           car
SFX X   gar            guem           gar
SFX X   çar            cem            çar
SFX X   r              i              ar
SFX X   er             o              [^cug\-]er
SFX X   cer            ço             cer
SFX X   ger            jo             ger
SFX X   guer           go             guer
SFX X   r              s              er
SFX X   er             e              er
SFX X   r              mos            er
SFX X   r              is             er
SFX X   r              m              er
SFX X   er             a              [^cug\-]er
SFX X   cer            ça             cer
SFX X   ger            ja             ger
SFX X   guer           ga             guer
SFX X   er             as             [^cug]er
SFX X   cer            ças            cer
SFX X   ger            jas            ger
SFX X   guer           gas            guer
SFX X   er             amos           [^cug]er
SFX X   cer            çamos          cer
SFX X   ger            jamos          ger
SFX X   guer           gamos          guer
SFX X   er             ais            [^cug]er
SFX X   cer            çais           cer
SFX X   ger            jais           ger
SFX X   guer           gais           guer
SFX X   er             am             [^cug]er
SFX X   cer            çam            cer
SFX X   ger            jam            ger
SFX X   guer           gam            guer
SFX X   r              i              er
SFX X   ir             o              [^cug\-]ir
SFX X   cir            ço             cir
SFX X   gir            jo             gir
SFX X   quir           co             quir
SFX X   uir            o              guir
SFX X   ir             es             ir
SFX X   ir             e              ir
SFX X   r              mos            ir
SFX X   r              s              ir
SFX X   ir             em             ir
SFX X   ir             a              [^cug\-]ir
SFX X   cir            ça             cir
SFX X   gir            ja             gir
SFX X   quir           ca             quir
SFX X   uir            a              guir
SFX X   ir             as             [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir            ças            cir
SFX X   gir            jas            gir
SFX X   quir           cas            quir
SFX X   uir            as             guir
SFX X   ir             amos           [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir            çamos          cir
SFX X   gir            jamos          gir
SFX X   quir           camos          quir
SFX X   uir            amos           guir
SFX X   ir             ais            [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir            çais           cir
SFX X   gir            jais           gir
SFX X   quir           cais           quir
SFX X   uir            ais            guir
SFX X   ir             am             [^cug]ir
SFX X   cir            çam            cir
SFX X   gir            jam            gir
SFX X   quir           cam            quir
SFX X   uir            am             guir
SFX X   ar             á              ar
SFX X   er             ê              er
